fi: Aseman muototekijä: Täyskorkea; Puolikorkeus; Ohut; Muu
sv: Enhetsformfaktor: Full höjd; Halv höjd; Slimmad; Övrigt
bg-BG: Типоразмер на диска: Пълна височина; Половин височина; Тънък; Други
tr: Sürücü form faktörü: Tam yükseklik; Yarım yükseklik; İnce tip; Diğer
ro-RO: Factor de formă unitate: Înălțime completă; Jumătate de înălțime; Subțire; Altele
it: Fattore di forma dell'unità: Altezza completa; Mezza altezza; Sottile; Altro
vi: Kiểu dáng ổ đĩa: Chiều cao đầy đủ; Nửa chiều cao; Siêu mỏng; Khác
th: รูปแบบไดรฟ์: ความสูงเต็ม; ความสูงครึ่ง; แบบบาง; อื่นๆ
es: Factor de forma de la unidad: Altura completa; Media altura; Delgado; Otros
cs: Provedení jednotky: Plná výška; Poloviční výška; Tenký profil; Jiné
da: Drev-formfaktor: Fuld højde; Halv højde; Slanklinjet; Andet
sl-SI: Oblika pogona: Polna višina; Polovična višina; Tanki; Drugo
ko: 드라이브 폼 팩터: 풀 하이트; 하프 하이트; 슬림라인; 기타
hu: Meghajtó formátuma: Teljes magasságú; Fél magasság; Vékony; Egyéb
de: Laufwerk-Formfaktor: Volle Höhe; Halbe Höhe; Schlank; Sonstiges
fr: Facteur de forme du disque dur: Pleine hauteur; Demi-hauteur; Mince; Autre
lt-LT: Disko formos faktorius: Viso aukščio; Pusės aukščio; Plonas; Kita
pl: Format napędu: Pełna wysokość; Połowa wysokości; Slimline; Inne
hr-HR: Oblik pogona: Puna visina; Polovične visine; Tanki; Ostalo
ja: ドライブフォームファクター: フルハイト; ハーフハイト; スリムライン; その他
ru: Формфактор привода: Полноразмерный; Половинной высоты; Тонкий; Другой
en: Drive form factor: Full-height; Half-height; Slimline; Other
nl: Vormfactor station: Volledige hoogte; Halve hoogte; Slimline; Andere
sk-SK: Tvarový faktor pohonu: Plná výška; Polovičná výška; Tenký; Iné
zh-TW: 磁碟機外型規格: 全高型; 半高; 超薄型; 其他
pt-PT: Formato da unidade: Altura completa; Meia altura; Fino; Outro
nb: Stasjonsformfaktor: Full høyde; Halv høyde; Slankeprofil; Annet
el: Παράγοντας μορφής μονάδας: Πλήρους ύψους; Μισού ύψους; Λεπτός; Άλλο
pt-BR: Formato da unidade: Altura total; Meia altura; Linha fina; Outro
zh-CN: 驱动器外形: 全高型; 半高; 超薄; 其他